Connecticut, session 2026, SB00083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a fund to be
known as the "Federal Cuts Response Fund". The fund shall contain any
moneys required by law to be deposited in the fund and shall be held
by the Treasurer separate and apart from all other moneys, funds and
accounts. Amounts in the fund shall be expended only pursuant to
appropriation by the General Assembly. Except as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, any balance remaining in the fund at the
end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the fund for the
subsequent fiscal year.
(b) After the accounts for the Federal Cuts Response Fund have been
closed for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and the Comptroller has
determined the amount of the unexpended balance in said fund, the
amount of such unexpended balance shall be transferred by the
Treasurer to the Budget Reserve Fund subject to the provisions of
subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) or (d) of section 4-
30a of the general statutes. The fund shall be terminated upon the
transfer of the balance in the fund or upon the Comptroller's
determination that there are no unexpended moneys available in the
fund to transfer.

Senate Bill No. 83
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (f) of section 4-30a of the general statutes, on the effective
date of this act, the Treasurer shall transfer the sum of $330,811,954 from
the Budget Reserve Fund to the Federal Cuts Response Fund,
established pursuant to section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) (a) The sum of $330,811,954 is
appropriated from the Federal Cuts Response Fund, established
pursuant to section 1 of this act, to the Office of Policy and Management,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the purpose of responding to
the policy impacts of P.L. 119-21 and mitigating any action or inaction
by the federal government that results in a reduction in funding for any
program in this state.
(b) That portion of unexpended funds appropriated in subsection (a)
of this section shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall continue to be
available for the purposes described in subsection (a) of this section
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
(c) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management may
transfer any portion of the amount appropriated in subsection (a) of this
section to any agency in any appropriated fund to give effect to the
purposes described in subsection (a) of this section. The unexpended
balance of any amount transferred pursuant to this section shall be
returned to the Federal Cuts Response Fund on June 30, 2027, and shall
lapse on said date.
Sec. 4. (Effective from passage) Prior to expending any moneys in
accordance with subsection (a) of section 3 of this act or transferring any
moneys in accordance with subsection (c) of section 3 of this act, the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall provide
electronic notice to the president pro tempore of the Senate, the speaker
of the House of Representatives, and the majority and minority leaders
of both houses of the General Assembly of the amount and purpose of
Special Act No. 26-1 2 of 3

Senate Bill No. 83
each such expenditure or transfer. Any such expenditure or transfer
may be disapproved by a majority vote of a committee consisting of said
members of the General Assembly not later than twenty-four hours after
the time the secretary provides notice pursuant to this section. Any
meeting of such committee may be conducted on a virtual platform that
is available to be viewed by members of the public. The secretary shall
not make any such expenditure or transfer before the expiration of such
twenty-four-hour period or after any such expenditure or transfer is
disapproved in accordance with this subsection.
Governor's Action:
Approved February 9, 2026
Special Act No. 26-1 3 of 3